Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.345

Copies of application for approval to be filed.

An applicant that desires to convert in accordance with this chapter shall file copies of an application for approval in the form and number prescribed by the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 384; 1981 c 85 s 68.]